South Dakota, session 2026, HB1125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is established a taskforce to study the continued technological development
and impact of artificial intelligence systems on the state. The taskforce shall consist of:
(1) The following members, appointed by the Executive Board of the Legislative
Research Council:
(a) Two members of the House of Representatives;
(b) Two members of the Senate;
(c) One member representing the health care industry;
(d) One member representing the banking and finance industry;
(e) One member representing the retail industry;
(f) One member representing the manufacturing industry;
(g) One member representing the technology industry;
(h) One individual employed by a school district as a teacher;
(i) One individual employed by a school district as an administrator;
(j) The auditor of a county with a population of fifteen thousand residents or
more;
(k) The auditor of a county with a population of fewer than fifteen thousand
residents;
(l) An official or employee of a municipality with a population of twenty
thousand residents or more;
(m) An official or employee of a municipality with a population of fewer than
twenty thousand residents; and
(n) The sheriff of a county or police chief of a municipality; and
(2) One member appointed by the Governor;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.242.23 2 1125
(3) One member appointed by the chief justice of the Supreme Court; and
(4) One member appointed by the Board of Regents.
A vacancy on the taskforce must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment.
The executive board shall appoint one legislator to serve as the chair and one
legislator, from the opposite chamber, to serve as the vice chair. The Legislative Research
Council shall provide administrative support to the taskforce.
The taskforce shall report its findings and recommendations and any proposed
legislation, including whether the taskforce should be continued, to the executive board,
on or before December 1, 2028. The task force is dissolved upon the delivery of the report
to the executive board.
Section 2. This Act is effective beginning January 1, 2027.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.